Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 25 Corn and Corn Meal

21-25-1.
“Rhode Island corn” defined.

Within the meaning of this chapter “Rhode Island corn” means corn of a light amber color, hard and sound of kernel, generally known as Rhode Island white cap corn and grown in the soil of Rhode Island within the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 898, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-25-1

.

21-25-2.
Labeling of containers of corn.

The words “Rhode Island” shall not be stamped, marked, printed, branded, or used on any package, bag, bottle, can, box, tub, firkin, or container of any kind in which any corn may be stored or from or in which corn may be sold or offered or exposed for sale unless the corn shall be Rhode Island corn within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 898, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-25-2

.

21-25-3.
Labeling of corn meal.

The words “Rhode Island” shall not be stamped, marked, printed, branded, or used on any package, bag, bottle, can, box, tub, firkin, or container of any kind in which any corn meal may be stored or from or in which corn meal may be sold or offered or exposed for sale unless the corn meal has been ground or manufactured in Rhode Island from Rhode Island corn within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 898, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-25-3

.

21-25-4.
Penalty for misbranding.

Every person, firm, or corporation, as principal, or by a servant, or agent, who shall sell or offer to sell or expose for sale or have in their possession with intent to sell, contrary to the provisions of this chapter, any package, bag, bottle, can, box, tub, firkin, or container of any kind which has been stamped, marked, printed, branded, and is to be used for the sale, offering, or exposing for sale of any Rhode Island corn meal when the corn meal contained in it has not been ground or manufactured in Rhode Island from Rhode Island corn as required by this chapter, shall for each offense be fined one hundred dollars ($100), one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the complainant and one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the state; and on trial for the offense, proof of the sale or offering to sell or of the exposing for sale of the article or substance shall be evidence or knowledge of the character of the article or substance so sold or offered or exposed for sale and of knowledge that it was not stamped, marked, printed, branded, or used in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 898, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-25-4

.

21-25-5.
Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the director of health to prosecute any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter, and the director when making a complaint shall not be required to give surety for the payment of costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 898, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-25-5

.